New York, session 2025-2026, S2703.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 17 of section 156 of the executive law, as 2 added by chapter 615 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as follows: 3 17. Issue a written report to the governor and legislature, on or 4 before February fifteenth of each year, on firefighter training activ- 5 ities. Such report shall include at least the following information: 6 the minimum training hours allocated on a county-by-county basis, the 7 training hours requested by each county, any unfulfilled training hour 8 requests, [and] the number of hours used by each county on a county-by- 9 county basis, and a statewide total of the number of hours allocated to 10 each firefighter. Such report shall also identify the fire department or 11 district providing the training including the number of hours of train- 12 ing and the type of training for each firefighter. In addition, such 13 report shall also list the names of those firefighters qualified to do 14 interior firefighting. The written report shall be prominently posted on 15 the division of homeland security and emergency services website no 16 later than March first of each year. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07157-01-5